src/fst/affixes/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Lushootseed language are bound to beginning of other words.

!! Beck, David 2018: Aspectual Affixation in Lushootseed: A minor reanalysis
!! ordering
!! Tense/mood | Poss.subj | nominalizers | Aspect | Stem | Object/voice | others
!! gʷə%<, ƛ̕u%<, tu%<, ɬu%<, bə%< | d%<, ad%< |s%<, dəxʷ%< | ʔu, ʔəs, lə, ləs, ləcu| X |%>s/%>bš, %>sut/%>ut, %>agʷəl, %>b |%>ləp, %>s, %>əxʷ

!! -1/-4?(lə=bə=ʔas-q̓ʷəl-il) proclitic Asp/Prog+:lə%<
!!-4  @U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@gʷə%< (+Sbj)
!!    @U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ƛ̕u%<  (+Hab)
!!    @U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-T.REM@tu%<   (TM/Past+)
!!    @U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ɬu%<  (+Fut)
!!    @U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@bə%<  (+Add)
!!-3  d%<, PxSg2+:ad%< ?| Add+:bə%< 
!!-2  NM+:s%<, dəxʷ%<
!! -1 aspect
!!   @U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%<  (non-circumscribed, progressive)
!! @U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔəs%<  (ongoing state: Asp/Stat)
!! @U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔas%<  (ongoing state: Asp/Stat)variant
!!   @U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ləs%< (Asp/ProgStat)
!! @U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ʔu%<  (Asp/Pfv)
!! -1 Asp/Cont+:ləcu%< (?Asp/Prog+:lə%< + Asp/Pfv+:ʔu%<) Skagit
!! -1 Asp/Stat:ʔə{sØ}{dØ}xʷ%< (Asp/Stat+:ʔəs%< + dxʷ%<)
!! 
!! X
!! 1 %>s/%>bš, %>sut/%>ut, %>agʷəl, %>b, +Inch:%>il
!! 2 %>ləp, +Px3:%>s, %>əxʷ
!! lə<bə<ləcu<gʷaadgʷad

LEXICON Prefixes
Prefixes_01 ;
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@gʷə%< Prefixes_01 ; !sbj = subjunctive
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ɬu%< Prefixes_01 ; ! qəlb 'rain': ɬuqəlb 'rain in the future' is this a noun, too? _intention to_

!Lonsdale 2001:211-212
!ɬubələskʷaxʷyildutəxʷčəɬ
!ɬu<bə<ləs<kʷaxʷ>y>il>d>ut>əxʷ>čəɬ
!Fut+ANEW+PgrSttv+help+YI+il+Trx+Rfx+Inc+our
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ɬu%<bə%<ləs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ɬu%<bə%<las%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-RE.RE@ɬu%<bə%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!gʷə%<ƛ̕u%<ʔas– Sbj+Hab+Stat
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@gʷə%<ƛ̕u%<ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@gʷə%<ƛ̕u%<ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@gʷə%<ƛ̕u%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!ƛ̕u%<ʔas– Hab+Stat
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ƛ̕u%<ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ƛ̕u%<ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ʔəsq̓iʔq̓aƛ̕əb _partly cloudy_ ɬasq̓iʔq̓aƛ̕əb __partly cloudy in the future__
!ʔəsgiʔgəqəb __partly sunny__ ɬasgiʔgəqəb __partly sunny in the future__
!ʔiɬgəqil __mostly sunny__ ɬasʔiɬgəqil __mostly sunny in the future__
!ʔəsgəqəb __sunny__ ɬasgəqil __sunny in the future__
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ɬəs%<  VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@@U.TAM-A.STAT@ɬas%<  VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ƛ̕u=bə= Hab+Add (check ordering)
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-RE.RE@ƛ̕u%<bə%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!bə%<ƛ̕u%< Add+Hab (check ordering)
@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@bə%<ƛ̕u%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!gʷə%<tu%< Sbj+Rem
@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@@U.TAM-T.REM@gʷə%<tu%< DVNouns   ; ! direct to PxSg1
!ƛ̕u%<ʔu%< Hab+Pfv
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PFV@ƛ̕u%<ʔu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ƛ̕u%<tu%<lə%< Hab+Rem+Prog
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-T.REM@@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-T.REM@@U.TAM-A.PROG@ƛ̕u%<tu%<lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
!ƛ̕u%<0%<lə%< Hab+Prog
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@@U.TAM-A.PROG@ƛ̕u%<lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;



LEXICON Prefixes_01
Prefixes_01a ;
@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@bə%< Prefixes_01a ;

LEXICON Prefixes_01a
Prefixes_01b ;
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ƛ̕u%< Prefixes_01b ;

LEXICON Prefixes_01b
Prefixes_01c ;
!@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     Prefixes_01c   ;
!@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<    Prefixes_01c   ;
 DVNouns_01 ;

LEXICON Prefixes_01c
 Nouns ;
! These are the first Northern Lushootseed
 N_NEWWORDS ;
 DVNouns   ;


LEXICON DVNouns
!@U.NMZ.V2N@:@U.NMZ.V2N@s%< DVNouns_01 ; !Need to mark this with flags 2021-06-30
!@U.NMZ.V2A@:@U.NMZ.V2A@dəxʷ%< DVNouns_01 ; !2022-12-25 moved to DVNouns_02-02
 DVNouns_01 ; !
 
!ƛ̕u=s=ʔəs Hab+Nmz+Stat

!ɬu=d=s=ʔaʔ Irr+PxSg1+Nmlz+be.there

LEXICON DVNouns_01
! followed by PX
@U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-T.REM@tu%< DVNouns_02-1 ; !remote past, any predicate
DVNouns_02-1 ;

LEXICON DVNouns_02-1
!@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     Prefixes_01c   ;!CHECKME2022
!@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<    Prefixes_01c   ;
@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     DVNouns_02-2   ;!CHECKME2022
@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<    DVNouns_02-2   ;
DVNouns_02-2 ;

LEXICON DVNouns_02-2
@U.NMZ.V2N@:@U.NMZ.V2N@s%< DVNouns_02-3 ; !Need to mark this with flags 2021-06-30
@U.NMZ.V2A@:@U.NMZ.V2A@dəxʷ%< DVNouns_02-3 ; !
DVNouns_02-3 ;

LEXICON DVNouns_02-3
!@U.TAM.NO@:@U.TAM.NO@ Verbs ; 
!verbprefix-     Verbs   ;
 VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;!non-circumscribed, progressive
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔəs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; !ongoing state
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔas%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; !ongoing state
@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ləs%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;
@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ʔu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ; ! qəlb 'rain': ʔuqəlb 'raining' doesn't sound perfect to me
@U.TAM-A.CONT@:@U.TAM-A.CONT@ləcu%< VERBS_OR_NOUNS ;




LEXICON VERBS_OR_NOUNS
:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%} Verbs ;
 N_NEWWORDS ;
 Nouns ;
 Adjectives ;
 
! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
